Utah statutes.
19-6-311.   Hazardous substances priority list.
(1)  The executive director shall develop and, as frequently as is necessary,
revise a hazardous substances priority list by making a rule that:
(a)  identifies separately national priority list sites, proposed national
priority list sites, and scored sites that pose a significant threat to the
public health or the environment; and
(b)  declares those sites to be eligible to be addressed under the authority
granted by this part.
(2)  The executive director may not spend fund money or use the authority
granted by this part to address any facilities containing hazardous substances
that are not on the hazardous substances priority list.
(3)  The executive director shall remove facilities from the hazardous
substances priority list when appropriate.
